
D12766

S2
W

E8
B

10

15

Engine and ECT ECUE1
Electronically Controlled
Transmission Solenoid

W
9

EB2
S2

DI−70
−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATICTRANSMISSION(A750F for2UZ −FE)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC P0976/63 Shift Solenoid ”B” Control Circuit Low
(Shift Solenoid Valve S2)

DTC P0977/63 Shift Solenoid ”B” Control Circuit High
(Shift Solenoid Valve S2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
See page DI−49.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0976/63
EngineandECTECUdetectsshort insolenoidvalveS2cir-
cuit 4 timeswhensolenoidvalveS2 isoperated (1 −tripdetec-
tion logic)

SShort inshift solenoidvalveS2circuit
SShift solenoidvalveS2

SEngineandECTECU

P0977/63
EngineandECTECUdetectsopen insolenoidvalveS2circuit
4 timeswhensolenoidvalveS2 isnotoperated (1 −tripdetec-
tion logic)

SOpen inshift solenoidvalveS2circuit
SShift solenoidvalveS2

SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between S2 of transmission wire connec-
tor and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal S2 and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
tor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals S2 and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).



D11992

(+)(−)

DI−72
−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ−FE)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

3 Check shift solenoid valve S2.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve S2.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
m inal and t he bat t er y negat ive lead t o t he s olenoid body
ground.
OK:

Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve S2
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


